Idaho, session 2026, S1261.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 59-1356, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-1356. REEMPLOYMENT OF RETIRED MEMBERS. (1) If an early retired mem-
ber, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, is reemployed with
an employer participating in the public employee retirement system of Idaho
within ninety (90) days from retiring, or the early retired member is guaran-
teed reemployment with an employer participating in the public employee re-
tirement system of Idaho, the member shall be considered to have continued in
the status of an employee and not to have separated from service. Any retire-
ment allowance payments received by the retired member shall be repaid to the
system and the retirement shall be negated. The month of last contribution
prior to the negated retirement and the month of initial contribution upon
return to reemployment shall be considered consecutive months of contribu-
tions in the determination of an appropriate salary base period upon subse-
quent retirement. A retired member is not considered to have separated from
service if he continues performing services for an employer participating
in the public employee retirement system of Idaho in any capacity, includ-
ing but not limited to independent contractor, leased employee, or temporary
services.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this
section, when a retired member meets the definition of an employee as defined
in section 59-1302(14)(A)(a), Idaho Code, any benefit payable on behalf of
such member shall be suspended and any contributions payable by such member
under sections 59-1331 through 59-1334, Idaho Code, shall again commence.
The suspended benefit, as adjusted pursuant to section 59-1355, Idaho Code,
shall resume upon subsequent retirement, along with a separate allowance
computed with respect only to that salary and service credited during the
period of reemployment. Any death benefit that becomes payable under the
suspended benefit shall be payable under section 59-1361(2), Idaho Code.
Any death benefit that becomes payable with respect to salary and service
accrued during the period of reemployment shall be payable under section
59-1361(3), Idaho Code, if the member dies during the period of reemploy-
ment.
(3) If a retired member who is receiving a benefit that is not reduced
under section 59-1346, Idaho Code, and who has been retired for more than
six (6) months again becomes employed as defined in this section and section


59-1302(14)(A)(b), Idaho Code, as a result of being elected or appointed to a
an elective public office other than an office held prior to retirement, the
retired member may elect to continue receiving benefits and not accrue ad-
ditional service, in which event no contributions shall be made by the mem-
ber or employer during such reemployment and any benefit payable on behalf of
such member shall continue.
(4) If a retired school employee, as defined in section 59-1302(31A),
Idaho Code, who retired on or after age sixty (60) years or a retired pub-
lic safety officer returns to work as a school employee as defined in section
59-1302(31A), Idaho Code, and is receiving a benefit that is not reduced un-
der section 59-1346, Idaho Code, again becomes an employee as defined in this
section and section 59-1302(14), Idaho Code, as a result of returning to em-
ployment with a school district as provided in section 33-1004H, Idaho Code,
the retired member may elect to continue receiving benefits and not accrue
additional service, in which event no contributions shall be made by the mem-
ber during such reemployment and any benefit payable on behalf of such member
shall continue.
(5) If a retired member as defined in section 59-1302(27), Idaho Code,
who retired prior to January 1, 2022, and retired on or after age fifty-five
(55) years again becomes an employee as defined in this section and in sec-
tion 59-1302(14), Idaho Code, as a result of returning to employment with an
employer as defined in section 59-1302(15), Idaho Code, the retired member
may elect to continue receiving benefits and not to accrue additional ser-
vice. In such a situation, no contributions shall be made by the member dur-
ing the reemployment and any benefit payable on behalf of such member shall
continue. This subsection shall no longer be in force and effect after June
30, 2026, however, the other provisions of this section shall remain in full
force and effect and shall remain applicable to all employment.
(6) A retired member as defined in section 59-1302(27), Idaho Code,
with police officer status as defined in section 59-1303, Idaho Code, or
with firefighter member status as defined in section 59-1302(16), Idaho
Code, who retires on or after age fifty (50) years and who, within thirty
(30) days after retiring, again becomes an employee as defined in section
59-1302(14), Idaho Code, with an employer participating in PERSI, or who
is guaranteed reemployment with an employer participating in PERSI, shall
be considered to have continued in the status of an employee and not to have
separated from service. As a result of returning to employment with an em-
ployer as defined in section 59-1302(15), Idaho Code, the retired member may
elect to continue receiving benefits and not to accrue additional service.
In such a situation, contributions shall be made by the member and employer
during the reemployment at the rate established by PERSI for police officer
or firefighter members, as applicable, and any benefit payable on behalf of
such member shall continue. The provisions of this subsection shall be null,
void, and of no force and effect after June 30, 2027. However, the other
provisions of this section shall remain in full force and effect and shall
remain applicable to all employment.
(7) It is the responsibility of each employer to immediately report to
the retirement board the employment of any retired member so that benefit
payments can be suspended as provided in this section. If an employer fails
to properly report the employment of a retired member and it results in the


retirement board making benefit payments that should have been suspended,
the employer shall, in addition to paying delinquent employee and employer
contributions from the date of eligibility, also be responsible for repaying
to the retirement board the benefit payments made to the retired member that
should have been suspended, plus interest. The employer may then recoup such
payments from the retired member.
(8)(a) A retired member may provide services as a bona fide volunteer
for an employer as defined in section 59-1302, Idaho Code, after retire-
ment. Such service shall not be considered reemployment of a retired
member, and a retired member who is a bona fide volunteer will not be
considered to be an employee as defined in section 59-1302(14), Idaho
Code.
(b) A retired member shall not claim to be a bona fide volunteer un-
less such retired member qualifies as a bona fide volunteer pursuant to
this subsection. Any retirement allowance payments received by a re-
tired member who is not a bona fide volunteer shall be repaid to the sys-
tem, such retired member's retirement shall be negated, and the provi-
sions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "bona fide volunteer" means
an individual who performs service without promise, expectation, or re-
ceipt of any type of compensation, who is not performing a kind of work
or service that would normally be compensated by an employer, and who
is not classifying employment conduct as volunteering in an effort to
avoid being considered an employee as defined in section 59-1302(14),
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.